Utah statutes.
39-2-9.   Cities may assist in erecting armories.
The board of commissioners and city councils of cities shall have power to
appropriate from any funds of the city available for general purposes such
sums as they may deem expedient for the purpose of assisting the State Armory
Board in the erection of armories within their respective cities, and for the
maintenance of armories located and maintained therein, and in all cities
where waterworks and an electric light plant are owned by the city the water
and electric light used in armories maintained therein may at the discretion
of the city be furnished without cost.
